runtime/dict/uk_UA.aff
SFX b Y 33
SFX b єць йця єць
SFX b яць йця яць
SFX b ей 'я ей
SFX b ев ва ев
SFX b ек ка ек
SFX b ел ла ел
SFX b ем ма ем
SFX b ен на ен
SFX b ер ра ер
SFX b ес са ес
SFX b ет та ет
SFX b ов ва ов
SFX b ок ка ок
SFX b ол ла ол
SFX b ом ма ом
SFX b он на он
SFX b ор ра ор
SFX b ос са ос
SFX b от та от
SFX b ень ьня лень
SFX b ець ьця лець
SFX b іль ля [^л]іль
SFX b інь ня [^л]інь
SFX b іть тя [^л]іть
SFX b іць ця [^л]іць
SFX b ель ля [^л]ель
SFX b ень ня [^л]ень
SFX b еть тя [^л]еть
SFX b ець ця [^л]ець
SFX b оль ля [^л]оль
SFX b онь ня [^л]онь
SFX b оть тя [^л]оть
SFX b оць ця [^л]оць
SFX c Y 2
SFX c 'я 'ю м'я
SFX c 'я 'ї м'я
SFX d Y 7
SFX d о а сько
SFX d о ів сько
SFX d о а ло
SFX d о 0 ло
SFX d о ам о
SFX d о ами о
SFX d о ах о
SFX e Y 1
SFX e ївці євець ївці
SFX f Y 165
SFX f єць йці єць
SFX f яць йці яць
SFX f єць йців єць
SFX f яць йців яць
SFX f єць йцям єць
SFX f яць йцям яць
SFX f єць йцями єць
SFX f яць йцями яць
SFX f єць йцях єць
SFX f яць йцях яць
SFX f ей 'ї ей
SFX f ей 'їв ей
SFX f ей 'ям ей
SFX f ей 'ями ей
SFX f ей 'ях ей
SFX f іль лі [^л]іль
SFX f інь ні [^л]інь
SFX f іть ті [^л]іть
SFX f іць ці [^л]іць
SFX f оль лі [^л]оль
SFX f онь ні [^л]онь
SFX f оть ті [^л]оть
SFX f оць ці [^л]оць
SFX f ель лі [^л]ель
SFX f ень ні [^л]ень
SFX f еть ті [^л]еть
SFX f ець ці [^л]ець
SFX f іль лів [^л]іль
SFX f інь нів [^л]інь
SFX f іть тів [^л]іть
SFX f іць ців [^л]іць
SFX f оль лів [^л]оль
SFX f онь нів [^л]онь
SFX f оть тів [^л]оть
SFX f оць ців [^л]оць
SFX f ель лів [^л]ель
SFX f ень нів [^л]ень
SFX f еть тів [^л]еть
SFX f ець ців [^л]ець
SFX f іль лям [^л]іль
SFX f інь ням [^л]інь
SFX f іть тям [^л]іть
SFX f іць цям [^л]іць
SFX f оль лям [^л]оль
SFX f онь ням [^л]онь
SFX f оть тям [^л]оть
SFX f оць цям [^л]оць
SFX f ель лям [^л]ель
SFX f ень ням [^л]ень
SFX f еть тям [^л]еть
SFX f ець цям [^л]ець
SFX f іль лями [^л]іль
SFX f інь нями [^л]інь
SFX f іть тями [^л]іть
SFX f іць цями [^л]іць
SFX f оль лями [^л]оль
SFX f онь нями [^л]онь
SFX f оть тями [^л]оть
SFX f оць цями [^л]оць
SFX f ель лями [^л]ель
SFX f ень нями [^л]ень
SFX f еть тями [^л]еть
SFX f ець цями [^л]ець
SFX f іль лях [^л]іль
SFX f інь нях [^л]інь
SFX f іть тях [^л]іть
SFX f іць цях [^л]іць
SFX f оль лях [^л]оль
SFX f онь нях [^л]онь
SFX f оть тях [^л]оть
SFX f оць цях [^л]оць
SFX f ель лях [^л]ель
SFX f ень нях [^л]ень
SFX f еть тях [^л]еть
SFX f ець цях [^л]ець
SFX f ев ви ев
SFX f ек ки ек
SFX f ел ли ел
SFX f ем ми ем
SFX f ен ни ен
SFX f ер ри ер
SFX f ес си ес
SFX f ет ти ет
SFX f ов ви ов
SFX f ок ки ок
SFX f ол ли ол
SFX f ом ми ом
SFX f он ни он
SFX f ор ри ор
SFX f ос си ос
SFX f от ти от
SFX f ев вів ев
SFX f ек ків ек
SFX f ел лів ел
SFX f ем мів ем
SFX f ен нів ен
SFX f ер рів ер
SFX f ес сів ес
SFX f ет тів ет
SFX f ов вів ов
SFX f ок ків ок
SFX f ол лів ол
SFX f ом мів ом
SFX f он нів он
SFX f ор рів ор
SFX f ос сів ос
SFX f от тів от
SFX f ев вам ев
SFX f ек кам ек
SFX f ел лам ел
SFX f ем мам ем
SFX f ен нам ен
SFX f ер рам ер
SFX f ес сам ес
SFX f ет там ет
SFX f ов вам ов
SFX f ок кам ок
SFX f ол лам ол
SFX f ом мам ом
SFX f он нам он
SFX f ор рам ор
SFX f ос сам ос
SFX f от там от
SFX f ев вами ев
SFX f ек ками ек
SFX f ел лами ел
SFX f ем мами ем
SFX f ен нами ен
SFX f ер рами ер
SFX f ес сами ес
SFX f ет тами ет
SFX f ов вами ов
SFX f ок ками ок
SFX f ол лами ол
SFX f ом мами ом
SFX f он нами он
SFX f ор рами ор
SFX f ос сами ос
SFX f от тами от
SFX f ев вах ев
SFX f ек ках ек
SFX f ел лах ел
SFX f ем мах ем
SFX f ен нах ен
SFX f ер рах ер
SFX f ес сах ес
SFX f ет тах ет
SFX f ов вах ов
SFX f ок ках ок
SFX f ол лах ол
SFX f ом мах ом
SFX f он нах он
SFX f ор рах ор
SFX f ос сах ос
SFX f от тах от
SFX f ень ьні лень
SFX f ець ьці лець
SFX f ень ьнів лень
SFX f ець ьців лець
SFX f ень ьням лень
SFX f ець ьцям лець
SFX f ень ьнями лень
SFX f ець ьцями лець
SFX f ень ьнях лень
SFX f ець ьцях лець
SFX g Y 10
SFX g ий а ий
SFX g ий ої ий
SFX g ий ій ий
SFX g ий у ий
SFX g ий ою ий
SFX g ій я ій
SFX g ій ьої ій
SFX g ій ій ій
SFX g ій ю ій
SFX g ій ьою ій
SFX h Y 18
SFX h ев ве ев
SFX h ел ле ел
SFX h ем ме ем
SFX h ен не ен
SFX h ер ре ер
SFX h ес се ес
SFX h ет те ет
SFX h ов ве ов
SFX h ол ле ол
SFX h ом ме ом
SFX h он не он
SFX h ор ре ор
SFX h ос се ос
SFX h от те от
SFX h ець че [^л]ець
SFX h ок че ок
SFX h ець ьче лець
SFX h єць йче ієць
SFX i Y 5
SFX i е і ще
SFX i е 0 ще
SFX i е ам ще
SFX i е ами ще
SFX i е ах ще
SFX k Y 5
SFX k я є ['ьіІйеиаоу]я
SFX k а е [жчшщ]а
SFX k а о [^жчшщ]а
SFX k я е [дзлнртсц]я
SFX k А О ГА
SFX l Y 5
SFX l 0 0 р
SFX l ідь еде ідь
SFX l іль еле іль
SFX l інь ене інь
SFX l іть ете іть
SFX m Y 123
SFX m їй його їй
SFX m їй йому їй
SFX m їй їм їй
SFX m їй я їй
SFX m їй йої їй
SFX m їй ю їй
SFX m їй йою їй
SFX m їй є їй
SFX m ій ього [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ьому [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ім [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій я [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ьої [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ю [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ьою [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій є [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ого [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ому [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ім [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій а [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ої [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій у [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій ою [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m ій е [жкчшщ]ій
SFX m 'є його 'є
SFX m 'є йому 'є
SFX m є їм 'є
SFX m я ьої я
SFX m я ій я
SFX m я ю я
SFX m я ьою я
SFX m я і я
SFX m я ім я
SFX m я іх я
SFX m я іми я
SFX m а ої а
SFX m а ій а
SFX m а у а
SFX m а ою а
SFX m а і а
SFX m а им а
SFX m а их а
SFX m а ими а
SFX m й 0 [ії]й
SFX m й х [ії]й
SFX m й ми [ії]й
SFX m е ого е
SFX m е ому е
SFX m е им е
SFX m е ім е
SFX m є ього [^']є
SFX m є ьому [^']є
SFX m є ім [^']є
SFX m і их і
SFX m і им і
SFX m і ими і
SFX m ийсь огось ийсь
SFX m ийсь омусь ийсь
SFX m ийсь имсь ийсь
SFX m ийсь имось ийсь
SFX m ийсь імсь ийсь
SFX m ийсь ась ийсь
SFX m ийсь оїсь ийсь
SFX m ийсь ійсь ийсь
SFX m ийсь усь ийсь
SFX m ийсь оюсь ийсь
SFX m ийсь есь ийсь
SFX m ийсь ісь ийсь
SFX m ийсь ихсь ийсь
SFX m ийсь ихось ийсь
SFX m ийсь имись ийсь
SFX m 0 ого [іїи]н
SFX m 0 ому [іїи]н
SFX m 0 им [іїи]н
SFX m 0 ім [іїи]н
SFX m 0 а [іїи]н
SFX m 0 ої [іїи]н
SFX m 0 ій [іїи]н
SFX m 0 у [іїи]н
SFX m 0 ою [іїи]н
SFX m 0 е [іїи]н
SFX m 0 і [іїи]н
SFX m 0 их [іїи]н
SFX m 0 ими [іїи]н
SFX m ів ового [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів овому [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів овим [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів овім [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів ова [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів ової [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів овій [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів ову [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів овою [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів ове [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів ові [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів ових [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ів овими [^жчшщ]ів
SFX m ий ого ий
SFX m ий ому ий
SFX m ий им ий
SFX m ий ім ий
SFX m ий а ий
SFX m ий ої ий
SFX m ий ій ий
SFX m ий у ий
SFX m ий ою ий
SFX m ий е ий
SFX m ий і ий
SFX m ий их ий
SFX m ий ими ий
SFX m їв євого їв
SFX m їв євому їв
SFX m їв євим їв
SFX m їв євім їв
SFX m їв єва їв
SFX m їв євої їв
SFX m їв євій їв
SFX m їв єву їв
SFX m їв євою їв
SFX m їв єве їв
SFX m їв єві їв
SFX m їв євих їв
SFX m їв євими їв
SFX n Y 2
SFX n ти то [^с]ти
SFX n сти то сти
SFX o Y 1
SFX o а о [жчшщ]а
SFX p Y 36
SFX p іть отей іть
SFX p іть отям іть
SFX p іть отями іть
SFX p іть отях іть
SFX p іч очей [мн]іч
SFX p іч очам [мн]іч
SFX p іч очами [мн]іч
SFX p іч очах [мн]іч
SFX p ь ей [^їі]сть
SFX p ь ям [^їі]сть
SFX p ь ями [^їі]сть
SFX p ь ях [^їі]сть
SFX p іш ошів іш
SFX p іш ошам іш
SFX p іш ошами іш
SFX p іш ошах іш
SFX p іль олей іль
SFX p іль олям іль
SFX p іль олями іль
SFX p іль олях іль
SFX p іч ечей [^нм]іч
SFX p іч ечам [^нм]іч
SFX p іч ечами [^нм]іч
SFX p іч ечах [^нм]іч
SFX p ість остей ість
SFX p ість остям ість
SFX p ість остями ість
SFX p ість остях ість
SFX p їсть йостей їсть
SFX p їсть йостям їсть
SFX p їсть йостями їсть
SFX p їсть йостях їсть
SFX p ідь одей ідь
SFX p ідь одям ідь
SFX p ідь одями ідь
SFX p ідь одях ідь
SFX q Y 20
SFX q а 0 а
SFX q и 0 и
SFX q а ам а
SFX q и ам и
SFX q а ами а
SFX q и ами и
SFX q а ах а
SFX q и ах и
SFX q і ь [лнцс]і
SFX q і ям [лнцс]і
SFX q і ями [лнцс]і
SFX q і ях [лнцс]і
SFX q ї й ї
SFX q ї ям ї
SFX q ї ями ї
SFX q ї ях ї
SFX q і 0 [^лнцс]і
SFX q і ам [^лнцс]і
SFX q і ами [^лнцс]і
SFX q і ах [^лнцс]і
