runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
Анди/q
Апрелівка/&k
Аркадіївці/se
Аркаша/&oj
ассирієць/4bf
аудіододаток/4bf
багачисько/2d
байройтський/m
Бакоти/q
басило/TuU2d
безвісність/Bp
Беззаботівка/&k
безсердечність/Bp
Береговський/Fg
бібліографознавець/4bf
бізнес-новини/q
Біївці/se
біоланцюжок/4bf
Блонський/Fga
бобер/4bfh
боривітер/4bfh
Боронява/&k
босовило/TuU2d
бубон/4bf2%
Будаївці/se
Бурківський/Fga
бурмистер/4bfh
бухикало/TuU2d
в'їзний/m
в'юнок/4bf
вакації/q
ввічливість/Bp
вдряпнути/Zn
веб-майстер/4bfh
великомучениця/&<k
веронець/4bf
Вертинський/Fga
видерти/Zn
вим'я/Sc\
вимкнути/ZOn
виривок/4bf
виткнути/Zn
віддерти/Zn
відломок/4bf
відперти/Zn
відплутаний/m
відсталість/Bp
відчути/[n
Вінярський/Fga
вірянка/&=k
вітер/4fh
властолюбець/4bf
Вовчиці/q
Володіївці/se
вприснути/Zn
втоплений/mFga
гакало/TuU2d
гаманець/4bf
Гаркуша/&ko
Гаспра/&k
Геївці/se
генеральша/&<ko
гетерополярність/Bp
гільзовий/m
Глаша/&o
годинничок/4bf
голодранець/4bfh
гомзило/TuU2d
городок/4bf
Града/&k
Гречаний/Fga
Гречища/q
Гриша/&oj
Даша/&oj
деревоточець/4bf
джугастрівський/m
Джуржівка/&k
дзвінець/4bf
дідисько/TuUV2d
діткнути/Zn
Дніпряни/q
Дністер/4bh
доброзичливість/Bp
Довнар-Запольський/Fga
доробло/TuU2d
дошити/[n
дурбецало/TuU2d
дурило/TuU2d
екзистенціалістка/&=k
ексберкутівець/4bf
експосадовець/4bf
екстрамайстер/4bfh
Елайджа/&o
енергоємність/Bp
євробаталії/q
жартівний/m
жмурко/TuV2d
Жужа/&o
журналістикознавиця/&<k
забайкалець/4bf
Заблоцький/Fga
завзятець/4bf
загинайло/TuU2d
закам'янілість/Bp
запороти/Zn
Зарожани/q
захисточок/4bf
збитковіший/m
зброймайстер/4bfh
звоєць/4bf
Згарський/Fga
здерти/Zn
здоровило/TuU2d
злагідність/Bp
золотоніска/&=k
ім'я/Scy
індоєвропеєць/4bf
іпотекодавець/4bf
Кадиївці/se
Казерта/&k
кальсони/qs
капловухий/m
Карпуша/&o
касовість/Bp
келішок/4bf
Кеша/&o
килимець/4bf
кіммерійка/&=k
Ключевський/Fga
козел/4bfh
Кокоша/&o
колоти/Z|wnO
Колубаївці/se
Компанієць/4b
контрдзвінок/4bf
контрреформи/q
корівонька/&=k
котисько/TuUV2d
Красуцький/Fga
кріпосний/m
круглячок/4bf
Кугаївці/se
Кудіївці/se
кульгавість/Bp
Кульчіївці/se
купець/4bfh
купцівна/&=k
кучерявець/4bf
Кучі/q
Левицький/Fga
листоноша/&<ko
лівобережець/4bf
літераторка/&=k
Лукачани/q
любомудрець/4bfh
Лютий/Fga
магараджа/&Yko
магістер/4bfh
майстер/4bfh
Малаївці/se
Маліївці/se
Малуша/&<o
Матеївці/se
махараджа/&<ko
мертво-блідий/m
миловидність/Bp
Милуша/&<o
мисливець/4bfh
Міка/&k
мікроосередок/4f
міхоноша/&<ko
Млинець/4b
Могилевський/Fg
Мойша/&o
Мокіївці/se
Мочеради/q
мудило/TuU2d
мурмило/TuU2d
найгуманніше/m
найфривольніший/m
нам'яти/Zn
направленість/Bp
Наташа/&<oj
Недобоївці/se
недоброзичливість/Bp
неземлеробський/m
неістотність/Bp
непереконливість/Bp
нерозважність/Bp
нечутливість/Bp
низькопосадовець/4bf
німець/4fbh
Новоласпа/&k
новосанжарець/4bf
нудиженський/m
обжерти/Zn
Ободовський/Fga
обстрижчини/q
Огіївці/se
одоробало/TuU2d
окаянець/4bfh
околичність/Bp
окути/[n
осетер/4bfh
падло/TuU2d
панотець/4bfh
параксіальний/m
патрубок/4bf
Паша/&oj
пеньок/4bf
Первухинка/&k
перемови/q
переплюнути/Zn
Пивоварський/Fga
підганяйло/TuU2d
піддатливість/Bp
підманути/Zn
підшивайло/TuU2d
піскомийний/m
плем'я/Scy
поганець/4bfh
пожилець/4bf
позіхайло/TuU2d
поковзень/4bf
Положинський/Fga
полоти/Z|wOn
помиї/sq
послідовніший/m
прекрасність/Bp
примкнути/ZOn
Пробійнівка/&k
прорити/[n
професійніше/m
профспілківець/4bf
псалом/4bf
псевдоповстанець/4bfh
Пустомити/qs
раджа/&Yko
Развадовський/Fga
розкинути/ZOn
розладнаність/Bp
розширювальний/m
самотортури/q
санлікарка/&=k
Саша/&ojk
Свідерський/Fga
свіжачок/4bf
святець/4bf
Синіша/&o
сім'я/&=Sc
смолявський/m
солдатисько/TuUV2d
соцнорми/q
співобвинувачений/Fga
сповідниця/&<k
сполоснути/Zn
сріблястість/Bp
страждалець/4bfh
страйкомівець/4bf
страшидло/TuU2d
ступінь/3@J4bf
Танюша/&oj
телемаси/q
тендітненький/m
тім'я/Sc\
Торський/Fga
Троя/&k
Удріївці/se
удягнути/ZOn
ужгородець/4bf
улюбленець/4bfh
умілець/4bfh
упанішади/q
упередженість/Bp
Феліксин/m
Хорови/q
Худіївці/se
Хуторний/Fga
цехмістер/4bfh
Циганка/&k
Черіївці/se
чирок/4bf
чоловічисько/TuUV2d
чужоземець/4bfh
шашличок/4bf
шкандибайло/TuU2d
Шовський/Fga
штанчата/q
щонайпоінформованіший/m
якнайгидкіший/m
